Illinois, session 104th, SB1221.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 24-1.9 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/24-1.9)7    Sec. 24-1.9. Manufacture, possession, delivery, sale, and 8purchase of assault weapons, .50 caliber rifles, and .50 9caliber cartridges.10    (a) Definitions. In this Section:11    (1) "Assault weapon" means any of the following, except as 12provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection: 13        (A) A semiautomatic rifle that has the capacity to 14    accept a detachable magazine or that may be readily 15    modified to accept a detachable magazine, if the firearm 16    has one or more of the following:17            (i) a pistol grip or thumbhole stock;18            (ii) any feature capable of functioning as a 19        protruding grip that can be held by the non-trigger 20        hand;21            (iii) a folding, telescoping, thumbhole, or 22        detachable stock, or a stock that is otherwise 23        foldable or adjustable in a manner that operates to   SB1221- 2 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1        reduce the length, size, or any other dimension, or 2        otherwise enhances the concealability of, the weapon; 3            (iv) a flash suppressor;4            (v) a grenade launcher;5            (vi) a shroud attached to the barrel or that 6        partially or completely encircles the barrel, allowing 7        the bearer to hold the firearm with the non-trigger 8        hand without being burned, but excluding a slide that 9        encloses the barrel. 10        (B) A semiautomatic rifle that has a fixed magazine 11    with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds, except 12    for an attached tubular device designed to accept, and 13    capable of operating only with, .22 caliber rimfire 14    ammunition.15        (C) A semiautomatic pistol that has the capacity to 16    accept a detachable magazine or that may be readily 17    modified to accept a detachable magazine, if the firearm 18    has one or more of the following:19            (i) a threaded barrel;20            (ii) a second pistol grip or another feature 21        capable of functioning as a protruding grip that can 22        be held by the non-trigger hand;23            (iii) a shroud attached to the barrel or that 24        partially or completely encircles the barrel, allowing 25        the bearer to hold the firearm with the non-trigger 26        hand without being burned, but excluding a slide that   SB1221- 3 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1        encloses the barrel;2            (iv) a flash suppressor; 3            (v) the capacity to accept a detachable magazine 4        at some location outside of the pistol grip; or5            (vi) a buffer tube, arm brace, or other part that 6        protrudes horizontally behind the pistol grip and is 7        designed or redesigned to allow or facilitate a 8        firearm to be fired from the shoulder. 9        (D) A semiautomatic pistol that has a fixed magazine 10    with the capacity to accept more than 15 rounds.11        (E) Any shotgun with a revolving cylinder. 12        (F) A semiautomatic shotgun that has one or more of 13    the following:14            (i) a pistol grip or thumbhole stock;15            (ii) any feature capable of functioning as a 16        protruding grip that can be held by the non-trigger 17        hand;18            (iii) a folding or thumbhole stock; 19            (iv) a grenade launcher;20            (v) a fixed magazine with the capacity of more 21        than 5 rounds; or 22            (vi) the capacity to accept a detachable magazine. 23        (G) Any semiautomatic firearm that has the capacity to 24    accept a belt ammunition feeding device.25        (H) Any firearm that has been modified to be operable 26    as an assault weapon as defined in this Section.   SB1221- 4 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1        (I) Any part or combination of parts designed or 2    intended to convert a firearm into an assault weapon, 3    including any combination of parts from which an assault 4    weapon may be readily assembled if those parts are in the 5    possession or under the control of the same person. 6        (J) All of the following rifles, copies, duplicates, 7    variants, or altered facsimiles with the capability of any 8    such weapon: 9            (i) All AK types, including the following:10                (I) AK, AK47, AK47S, AK-74, AKM, AKS, ARM, 11            MAK90, MISR, NHM90, NHM91, SA85, SA93, Vector Arms 12            AK-47, VEPR, WASR-10, and WUM. 13                (II) IZHMASH Saiga AK. 14                (III) MAADI AK47 and ARM. 15                (IV) Norinco 56S, 56S2, 84S, and 86S. 16                (V) Poly Technologies AK47 and AKS. 17                (VI) SKS with a detachable magazine. 18            (ii) all AR types, including the following:19                (I) AR-10. 20                (II) AR-15. 21                (III) Alexander Arms Overmatch Plus 16. 22                (IV) Armalite M15 22LR Carbine. 23                (V) Armalite M15-T. 24                (VI) Barrett REC7. 25                (VII) Beretta AR-70. 26                (VIII) Black Rain Ordnance Recon Scout.   SB1221- 5 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1                (IX) Bushmaster ACR. 2                (X) Bushmaster Carbon 15. 3                (XI) Bushmaster MOE series. 4                (XII) Bushmaster XM15. 5                (XIII) Chiappa Firearms MFour rifles. 6                (XIV) Colt Match Target rifles. 7                (XV) CORE Rifle Systems CORE15 rifles. 8                (XVI) Daniel Defense M4A1 rifles. 9                (XVII) Devil Dog Arms 15 Series rifles. 10                (XVIII) Diamondback DB15 rifles. 11                (XIX) DoubleStar AR rifles. 12                (XX) DPMS Tactical rifles. 13                (XXI) DSA Inc. ZM-4 Carbine. 14                (XXII) Heckler & Koch MR556. 15                (XXIII) High Standard HSA-15 rifles. 16                (XXIV) Jesse James Nomad AR-15 rifle. 17                (XXV) Knight's Armament SR-15. 18                (XXVI) Lancer L15 rifles. 19                (XXVII) MGI Hydra Series rifles. 20                (XXVIII) Mossberg MMR Tactical rifles. 21                (XXIX) Noreen Firearms BN 36 rifle. 22                (XXX) Olympic Arms. 23                (XXXI) POF USA P415. 24                (XXXII) Precision Firearms AR rifles. 25                (XXXIII) Remington R-15 rifles. 26                (XXXIV) Rhino Arms AR rifles.   SB1221- 6 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1                (XXXV) Rock River Arms LAR-15 or Rock River 2            Arms LAR-47. 3                (XXXVI) Sig Sauer SIG516 rifles and MCX 4            rifles. 5                (XXXVII) Smith & Wesson M&P15 rifles. 6                (XXXVIII) Stag Arms AR rifles. 7                (XXXIX) Sturm, Ruger & Co. SR556 and AR-556 8            rifles. 9                (XL) Uselton Arms Air-Lite M-4 rifles. 10                (XLI) Windham Weaponry AR rifles. 11                (XLII) WMD Guns Big Beast. 12                (XLIII) Yankee Hill Machine Company, Inc. 13            YHM-15 rifles. 14            (iii) Barrett M107A1.15            (iv) Barrett M82A1.16            (v) Beretta CX4 Storm.17            (vi) Calico Liberty Series.18            (vii) CETME Sporter. 19            (viii) Daewoo K-1, K-2, Max 1, Max 2, AR 100, and 20        AR 110C. 21            (ix) Fabrique Nationale/FN Herstal FAL, LAR, 22 22        FNC, 308 Match, L1A1 Sporter, PS90, SCAR, and FS2000. 23            (x) Feather Industries AT-9. 24            (xi) Galil Model AR and Model ARM. 25            (xii) Hi-Point Carbine. 26            (xiii) HK-91, HK-93, HK-94, HK-PSG-1, and HK USC.   SB1221- 7 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1            (xiv) IWI TAVOR, Galil ACE rifle. 2            (xv) Kel-Tec Sub-2000, SU-16, and RFB. 3            (xvi) SIG AMT, SIG PE-57, Sig Sauer SG 550, Sig 4        Sauer SG 551, and SIG MCX.5            (xvii) Springfield Armory SAR-48. 6            (xviii) Steyr AUG. 7            (xix) Sturm, Ruger & Co. Mini-14 Tactical Rifle 8        M-14/20CF. 9            (xx) All Thompson rifles, including the following: 10                (I) Thompson M1SB. 11                (II) Thompson T1100D. 12                (III) Thompson T150D. 13                (IV) Thompson T1B. 14                (V) Thompson T1B100D. 15                (VI) Thompson T1B50D. 16                (VII) Thompson T1BSB. 17                (VIII) Thompson T1-C. 18                (IX) Thompson T1D. 19                (X) Thompson T1SB. 20                (XI) Thompson T5. 21                (XII) Thompson T5100D. 22                (XIII) Thompson TM1. 23                (XIV) Thompson TM1C. 24            (xxi) UMAREX UZI rifle. 25            (xxii) UZI Mini Carbine, UZI Model A Carbine, and 26        UZI Model B Carbine.   SB1221- 8 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1            (xxiii) Valmet M62S, M71S, and M78. 2            (xxiv) Vector Arms UZI Type. 3            (xxv) Weaver Arms Nighthawk. 4            (xxvi) Wilkinson Arms Linda Carbine. 5        (K) All of the following pistols, copies, duplicates, 6    variants, or altered facsimiles with the capability of any 7    such weapon thereof: 8            (i) All AK types, including the following: 9                (I) Centurion 39 AK pistol. 10                (II) CZ Scorpion pistol. 11                (III) Draco AK-47 pistol. 12                (IV) HCR AK-47 pistol. 13                (V) IO Inc. Hellpup AK-47 pistol. 14                (VI) Krinkov pistol. 15                (VII) Mini Draco AK-47 pistol. 16                (VIII) PAP M92 pistol. 17                (IX) Yugo Krebs Krink pistol. 18            (ii) All AR types, including the following: 19                (I) American Spirit AR-15 pistol. 20                (II) Bushmaster Carbon 15 pistol. 21                (III) Chiappa Firearms M4 Pistol GEN II. 22                (IV) CORE Rifle Systems CORE15 Roscoe pistol. 23                (V) Daniel Defense MK18 pistol. 24                (VI) DoubleStar Corporation AR pistol. 25                (VII) DPMS AR-15 pistol. 26                (VIII) Jesse James Nomad AR-15 pistol.   SB1221- 9 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1                (IX) Olympic Arms AR-15 pistol. 2                (X) Osprey Armament MK-18 pistol. 3                (XI) POF USA AR pistols. 4                (XII) Rock River Arms LAR 15 pistol. 5                (XIII) Uselton Arms Air-Lite M-4 pistol. 6            (iii) Calico pistols. 7            (iv) DSA SA58 PKP FAL pistol. 8            (v) Encom MP-9 and MP-45. 9            (vi) Heckler & Koch model SP-89 pistol. 10            (vii) Intratec AB-10, TEC-22 Scorpion, TEC-9, and 11        TEC-DC9. 12            (viii) IWI Galil Ace pistol, UZI PRO pistol. 13            (ix) Kel-Tec PLR 16 pistol. 14            (x) All MAC types, including the following: 15                (I) MAC-10. 16                (II) MAC-11. 17                (III) Masterpiece Arms MPA A930 Mini Pistol, 18            MPA460 Pistol, MPA Tactical Pistol, and MPA Mini 19            Tactical Pistol. 20                (IV) Military Armament Corp. Ingram M-11. 21                (V) Velocity Arms VMAC. 22            (xi) Sig Sauer P556 pistol. 23            (xii) Sites Spectre. 24            (xiii) All Thompson types, including the 25        following: 26                (I) Thompson TA510D.   SB1221- 10 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1                (II) Thompson TA5. 2            (xiv) All UZI types, including Micro-UZI. 3        (L) All of the following shotguns, copies, duplicates, 4    variants, or altered facsimiles with the capability of any 5    such weapon thereof: 6            (i) DERYA Anakon MC-1980, Anakon SD12. 7            (ii) Doruk Lethal shotguns. 8            (iii) Franchi LAW-12 and SPAS 12. 9            (iv) All IZHMASH Saiga 12 types, including the 10        following: 11                (I) IZHMASH Saiga 12. 12                (II) IZHMASH Saiga 12S. 13                (III) IZHMASH Saiga 12S EXP-01. 14                (IV) IZHMASH Saiga 12K. 15                (V) IZHMASH Saiga 12K-030. 16                (VI) IZHMASH Saiga 12K-040 Taktika. 17            (v) Streetsweeper. 18            (vi) Striker 12. 19    (2) "Assault weapon" does not include: 20        (A) Any firearm that is an unserviceable firearm or 21    has been made permanently inoperable.22        (B) An antique firearm or a replica of an antique 23    firearm.24        (C) A firearm that is manually operated by bolt, pump, 25    lever or slide action, unless the firearm is a shotgun 26    with a revolving cylinder.  SB1221- 11 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1        (D) Any air rifle as defined in Section 24.8-0.1 of 2    this Code.3        (E) Any handgun, as defined under the Firearm 4    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise listed in this 5    Section. 6    (3) "Assault weapon attachment" means any device capable 7of being attached to a firearm that is specifically designed 8for making or converting a firearm into any of the firearms 9listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection (a).10    (4) "Antique firearm" has the meaning ascribed to it in 18 11U.S.C. 921(a)(16).12    (5) ".50 caliber rifle" means a centerfire rifle capable 13of firing a .50 caliber cartridge. The term does not include 14any antique firearm, any shotgun including a shotgun that has 15a rifle barrel, or any muzzle-loader which uses black powder 16for hunting or historical reenactments.17    (6) ".50 caliber cartridge" means a cartridge in .50 BMG 18caliber, either by designation or actual measurement, that is 19capable of being fired from a centerfire rifle. The term ".50 20caliber cartridge" does not include any memorabilia or display 21item that is filled with a permanent inert substance or that is 22otherwise permanently altered in a manner that prevents ready 23modification for use as live ammunition or shotgun ammunition 24with a caliber measurement that is equal to or greater than .50 25caliber.26    (7) "Detachable magazine" means an ammunition feeding   SB1221- 12 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1device that may be removed from a firearm without disassembly 2of the firearm action, including an ammunition feeding device 3that may be readily removed from a firearm with the use of a 4bullet, cartridge, accessory, or other tool, or any other 5object that functions as a tool, including a bullet or 6cartridge.7    (8) "Fixed magazine" means an ammunition feeding device 8that is permanently attached to a firearm, or contained in and 9not removable from a firearm, or that is otherwise not a 10detachable magazine, but does not include an attached tubular 11device designed to accept, and capable of operating only with, 12.22 caliber rimfire ammunition. 13    (b) Except as provided in subsections (c), (d), and (e), 14on or after January 10, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 15102-1116), it is unlawful for any person within this State to 16knowingly manufacture, deliver, sell, import, or purchase or 17cause to be manufactured, delivered, sold, imported, or 18purchased by another, an assault weapon, assault weapon 19attachment, .50 caliber rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge.20    (c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), 21beginning January 1, 2024, it is unlawful for any person 22within this State to knowingly possess an assault weapon, 23assault weapon attachment, .50 caliber rifle, or .50 caliber 24cartridge. 25    (d) This Section does not apply to a person's possession 26of an assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, .50 caliber   SB1221- 13 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge device if the person lawfully 2possessed that assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, .50 3caliber rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge prohibited by 4subsection (c) of this Section, if the person has provided in 5an endorsement affidavit, prior to January 1, 2024, under oath 6or affirmation and in the form and manner prescribed by the 7Illinois State Police, no later than October 1, 2023:8        (1) the affiant's Firearm Owner's Identification Card 9    number;10        (2) an affirmation that the affiant: (i) possessed an 11    assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, .50 caliber 12    rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge before January 10, 2023 13    (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116); or (ii) 14    inherited the assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, 15    .50 caliber rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge from a person 16    with an endorsement under this Section or from a person 17    authorized under subdivisions (1) through (5) of 18    subsection (e) to possess the assault weapon, assault 19    weapon attachment, .50 caliber rifle, or .50 caliber 20    cartridge; and21        (3) the make, model, caliber, and serial number of the 22    .50 caliber rifle or assault weapon or assault weapons 23    listed in paragraphs (J), (K), and (L) of subdivision (1) 24    of subsection (a) of this Section possessed by the affiant 25    prior to January 10, 2023 (the effective date of Public 26    Act 102-1116) and any assault weapons identified and   SB1221- 14 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1    published by the Illinois State Police pursuant to this 2    subdivision (3). No later than October 1, 2023, and every 3    October 1 thereafter, the Illinois State Police shall, via 4    rulemaking, identify, publish, and make available on its 5    website, the list of assault weapons subject to an 6    endorsement affidavit under this subsection (d). The list 7    shall identify, but is not limited to, the copies, 8    duplicates, variants, and altered facsimiles of the 9    assault weapons identified in paragraphs (J), (K), and (L) 10    of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this Section and 11    shall be consistent with the definition of "assault 12    weapon" identified in this Section. The Illinois State 13    Police may adopt emergency rulemaking in accordance with 14    Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 15    The adoption of emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 16    of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act and this 17    paragraph is deemed to be necessary for the public 18    interest, safety, and welfare.19    The affidavit form shall include the following statement 20printed in bold type: "Warning: Entering false information on 21this form is punishable as perjury under Section 32-2 of the 22Criminal Code of 2012. Entering false information on this form 23is a violation of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act."24    In any administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding in 25this State, a completed endorsement affidavit submitted to the 26Illinois State Police by a person under this Section creates a   SB1221- 15 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1rebuttable presumption that the person is entitled to possess 2and transport the assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, 3.50 caliber rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge. 4    Beginning 90 days after January 10, 2023 (the effective 5date of Public Act 102-1116), a person authorized under this 6Section to possess an assault weapon, assault weapon 7attachment, .50 caliber rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge shall 8possess such items only: 9        (1) on private property owned or immediately 10    controlled by the person;11        (2) on private property that is not open to the public 12    with the express permission of the person who owns or 13    immediately controls such property;14        (3) while on the premises of a licensed firearms 15    dealer or gunsmith for the purpose of lawful repair;16        (4) while engaged in the legal use of the assault 17    weapon, assault weapon attachment, .50 caliber rifle, or 18    .50 caliber cartridge at a properly licensed firing range 19    or sport shooting competition venue; or20        (5) while traveling to or from these locations, 21    provided that the assault weapon, assault weapon 22    attachment, or .50 caliber rifle is unloaded and the 23    assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, .50 caliber 24    rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge is enclosed in a case, 25    firearm carrying box, shipping box, or other container. 26    Beginning on January 1, 2024, the person with the   SB1221- 16 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1endorsement for an assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, 2.50 caliber rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge or a person 3authorized under subdivisions (1) through (5) of subsection 4(e) to possess an assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, 5.50 caliber rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge may transfer the 6assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, .50 caliber rifle, 7or .50 caliber cartridge only to an heir, an individual 8residing in another state maintaining it in another state, or 9a dealer licensed as a federal firearms dealer under Section 10923 of the federal Gun Control Act of 1968. Within 10 days 11after transfer of the weapon except to an heir, the person 12shall notify the Illinois State Police of the name and address 13of the transferee and comply with the requirements of 14subsection (b) of Section 3 of the Firearm Owners 15Identification Card Act. The person to whom the weapon or 16ammunition is transferred shall, within 60 days of the 17transfer, complete an affidavit required under this Section. A 18person to whom the weapon is transferred may transfer it only 19as provided in this subsection.20    Except as provided in subsection (e) and beginning on 21January 1, 2024, any person who moves into this State in 22possession of an assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, 23.50 caliber rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge shall, within 60 24days, apply for a Firearm Owners Identification Card and 25complete an endorsement application as outlined in subsection 26(d).  SB1221- 17 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1    Notwithstanding any other law, information contained in 2the endorsement affidavit shall be confidential, is exempt 3from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, and 4shall not be disclosed, except to law enforcement agencies 5acting in the performance of their duties. Should this Section 6be found to be unconstitutional by a court with all appeals 7exhausted or expired, the Illinois State Police shall 8immediately and permanently destroy or have destroyed each 9endorsement affidavit and all information collected from the 10endorsement affidavit in possession of the Illinois State 11Police and any law enforcement agency. 12    (e) The provisions of this Section regarding the purchase 13or possession of assault weapons, assault weapon attachments, 14.50 caliber rifles, and .50 cartridges, as well as the 15provisions of this Section that prohibit causing those items 16to be purchased or possessed, do not apply to:17        (1) Peace officers, as defined in Section 2-13 of this 18    Code.19        (2) Qualified law enforcement officers and qualified 20    retired law enforcement officers as defined in the Law 21    Enforcement Officers Safety Act of 2004 (18 U.S.C. 926B 22    and 926C) and as recognized under Illinois law. 23        (3) Acquisition and possession by a federal, State, or 24    local law enforcement agency for the purpose of equipping 25    the agency's peace officers as defined in paragraph (1) or 26    (2) of this subsection (e).   SB1221- 18 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1        (4) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 2    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 3    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense.4        (5) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 5    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while 6    performing their official duties or while traveling to or 7    from their places of duty.8        (6) Any company that employs armed security officers 9    in this State at a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or 10    development site or facility regulated by the federal 11    Nuclear Regulatory Commission and any person employed as 12    an armed security force member at a nuclear energy, 13    storage, weapons, or development site or facility 14    regulated by the federal Nuclear Regulatory Commission who 15    has completed the background screening and training 16    mandated by the rules and regulations of the federal 17    Nuclear Regulatory Commission and while performing 18    official duties. 19        (7) Any private security contractor agency licensed 20    under the Private Detective, Private Alarm, Private 21    Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004 22    that employs private security contractors and any private 23    security contractor who is licensed and has been issued a 24    firearm control card under the Private Detective, Private 25    Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith 26    Act of 2004 while performing official duties.   SB1221- 19 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1    The provisions of this Section do not apply to the 2manufacture, delivery, sale, import, purchase, or possession 3of an assault weapon, assault weapon attachment, .50 caliber 4rifle, or .50 caliber cartridge or causing the manufacture, 5delivery, sale, importation, purchase, or possession of those 6items:7        (A) for sale or transfer to persons authorized under 8    subdivisions (1) through (7) of this subsection (e) to 9    possess those items;10        (B) for sale or transfer to the United States or any 11    department or agency thereof; or12        (C) for sale or transfer in another state or for 13    export.14    This Section does not apply to or affect any of the 15following: 16        (i) Possession of any firearm if that firearm is 17    sanctioned by the International Olympic Committee and by 18    USA Shooting, the national governing body for 19    international shooting competition in the United States, 20    but only when the firearm is in the actual possession of an 21    Olympic target shooting competitor or target shooting 22    coach for the purpose of storage, transporting to and from 23    Olympic target shooting practice or events if the firearm 24    is broken down in a nonfunctioning state, is not 25    immediately accessible, or is unloaded and enclosed in a 26    firearm case, carrying box, shipping box, or other similar   SB1221- 20 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1    portable container designed for the safe transportation of 2    firearms, and when the Olympic target shooting competitor 3    or target shooting coach is engaging in those practices or 4    events. For the purposes of this paragraph (8), "firearm" 5    has the meaning provided in Section 1.1 of the Firearm 6    Owners Identification Card Act.7        (ii) Any nonresident who transports, within 24 hours, 8    a weapon for any lawful purpose from any place where the 9    nonresident may lawfully possess and carry that weapon to 10    any other place where the nonresident may lawfully possess 11    and carry that weapon if, during the transportation, the 12    weapon is unloaded, and neither the weapon nor any 13    ammunition being transported is readily accessible or is 14    directly accessible from the passenger compartment of the 15    transporting vehicle. In the case of a vehicle without a 16    compartment separate from the driver's compartment, the 17    weapon or ammunition shall be contained in a locked 18    container other than the glove compartment or console. 19        (iii) Possession of a weapon at an event taking place 20    at the World Shooting and Recreational Complex at Sparta, 21    only while engaged in the legal use of the weapon, or while 22    traveling to or from that location if the weapon is broken 23    down in a nonfunctioning state, is not immediately 24    accessible, or is unloaded and enclosed in a firearm case, 25    carrying box, shipping box, or other similar portable 26    container designed for the safe transportation of   SB1221- 21 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1    firearms. 2        (iv) Possession of a weapon only for hunting use 3    expressly permitted under the Wildlife Code, or while 4    traveling to or from a location authorized for this 5    hunting use under the Wildlife Code if the weapon is 6    broken down in a nonfunctioning state, is not immediately 7    accessible, or is unloaded and enclosed in a firearm case, 8    carrying box, shipping box, or other similar portable 9    container designed for the safe transportation of 10    firearms. By October 1, 2023, the Illinois State Police, 11    in consultation with the Department of Natural Resources, 12    shall adopt rules concerning the list of applicable 13    weapons approved under this subparagraph (iv). The 14    Illinois State Police may adopt emergency rules in 15    accordance with Section 5-45 of the Illinois 16    Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of emergency 17    rules authorized by Section 5-45 of the Illinois 18    Administrative Procedure Act and this paragraph is deemed 19    to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 20    welfare. 21        (v) The manufacture, transportation, possession, sale, 22    or rental of blank-firing assault weapons and .50 caliber 23    rifles, or the weapon's respective attachments, to persons 24    authorized or permitted, or both authorized and permitted, 25    to acquire and possess these weapons or attachments for 26    the purpose of rental for use solely as props for a motion   SB1221- 22 -LRB104 03947 RLC 13971 b1    picture, television, or video production or entertainment 2    event. 3    Any person not subject to this Section may submit an 4endorsement affidavit if the person chooses. 5    (f) Any sale or transfer with a background check initiated 6to the Illinois State Police on or before January 10, 2023 (the 7effective date of Public Act 102-1116) is allowed to be 8completed after January 10, 2023 once an approval is issued by 9the Illinois State Police and any applicable waiting period 10under Section 24-3 has expired.11    (g) The Illinois State Police shall take all steps 12necessary to carry out the requirements of this Section by 13October 1, 2023. 14    (h) The Illinois State Police shall also develop and 15implement a public notice and public outreach campaign to 16promote awareness about the provisions of Public Act 102-1116 17and to increase compliance with this Section. 18(Source: P.A. 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)